Massachusetts, session 194th, H4042.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4C the
following section:-
Section 4C½. No insurer licensed to write and engaged in the writing of homeowners
insurance in the commonwealth nor the joint underwriting association, formed pursuant to
chapter 175C, shall cancel a homeowners insurance policy within fewer than 60 days of
notification to the policyholder of cancellation.
of 1